Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5718
Related persons, defined.

Related persons means any corporations, partnerships, limited liability companies, or joint ventures which are or would otherwise be members of the same unitary group, if incorporated, or any persons who are considered to be related persons under either section 267(b) and (c) or section 707(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 40.